Maryland, session 2026, HB0989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Department” means the Department of Aging.
10–215.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ANY STATE TAX CREDIT, HOUSING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, OR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM THAT:
(1) IS DESIGNED TO ASSIST ELDERLY INDIVIDUALS; AND
(2) LIMITS ELIGIBILITY TO INDIVIDUALS WITH LESS THAN A CERTAIN
AMOUNT OF INCOME.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE CALCULATION
OF INCOME FOR PURPOSES OF ELIGIBILITY FOR ANY STATE TAX CREDIT, HOUSING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, OR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM MAY NOT INCLUDE
INCOME THAT AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES FROM RENTING A PORTION OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S PRIMARY RESIDENCE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) REVIEW EACH STATE TAX CREDIT, HOUSING ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM, AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AND DETERMINE WHETHER THIS
SECTION APPLIES; AND
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THIS SECTION APPLIES,
NOTIFY THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT RESPONSIBLE FOR ADMINISTERING THE
CREDIT OR PROGRAM OF THE LIMITATION ON THE CALCULATION OF INCOME UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 989 3
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That, on or before December 1, 2026, the Department of Aging shall:
(1) in consultation with the Department of Disabilities, the Department of
Health, the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the Department of
Human Services, study the implications of prohibiting State housing assistance programs
and State medical assistance programs designed to assist aged, blind, and disabled
individuals and that limit eligibility based on income from including income that an
individual receives from renting a portion of the individual’s primary residence in the
calculation of income required for the program, including:
(i) identifying any barriers, including federal laws;
(ii) identifying necessary State resources; and
(iii) determining which State housing assistance programs and State
medical assistance programs such a prohibition could reasonably apply to, based on the
findings under items (i) and (ii) of this subsection; and
(2) report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on its findings
and recommendations.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.